Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 6
OFFENSES - NOTICE AND PREPARATION FOR ELECTIONS

1-13-601. Tampering with notices or supplies.

Any person who, prior to an election, willfully defaces, removes, or destroys any notice of election posted in accordance with the provisions of this code, or who, during an election, willfully defaces, removes, or destroys any card of instruction or sample ballot printed or posted for the instruction of electors, or who, during an election, willfully defaces, removes, or destroys any of the supplies or conveniences furnished to enable a voter to prepare the voter's ballot upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 433, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3127, § 22, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-130 as it existed prior to 1980.